test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tappw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tappõ: # Verb 26 'eng /est tappa/fin' - full paradigm
     tappõ+V+Inf: tappõ
     tappõ+V+Ger: tappõs
     tappõ+V+Sup: tapām
     tappõ+V+Sup+Ine: tapāmõs
     tappõ+V+Sup+Ela: tapāmõst
     tappõ+V+Sup+Tra: tapāmõks
     tappõ+V+Sup+Abe: tapāmõt
     tappõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tapāb
     tappõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tapāt
     tappõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tapābõd
     tappõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tapīz
     tappõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tapīzt, tapīztõ]
     tappõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tapīzt, tapīztõ]
     tappõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tap
     tappõ+V+Cond+Sg3: tapāks
     tappõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tapā
     tappõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: tappõ
     tappõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tapāgid
     tappõ+V+Jus+Sg3: tapāg
     tappõ+V+QuoSg3: tapāji
     tappõ+V+ActPrfPrc: tappõn
     tappõ+V+PssPrfPrc: taptõd
